Mississippi, session 2026, SB2130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 99-13-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-13-11.  (1)  In any criminal action in which the mental competency of a person charged with a felony is in question, the circuit or county court or judge in vacation on motion duly made by the defendant or the district attorney, or on the motion of the court or judge, may order the person to submit to a mental examination by a competent psychiatrist or psychologist selected by the court to determine his ability to make a defense * * *;. (2)  (a)  For defendants who are not indigent, any cost or expense in connection with such mental examination shall be paid by the county in which the criminal action is pending. (b)  For indigent defendants, any cost or expense in connection with such mental examination shall be paid by the state. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.